District of Columbia statutes.
34-205

“Electric generating facility” defined.

The term “electric generating facility” when used in this subtitle means all buildings, easements, real estate, mains, pipes, conduits, fixtures, meters, wires, poles, lamps, devices, and materials of any kind operated, owned, used, or to be used by a person for the generation of electricity. The term includes all buildings, easements, real estate, mains, pipes, conduits, fixtures, meters, wires, poles, lamps, devices, and materials of any kind operated, owned, used, or to be used by a person for cogeneration of electricity.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 976, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
as added May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 201(b)(7), 47 DCR 1091